Massachusetts, session 194th, S2422.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7AA of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:-
"A passenger in a motor vehicle on any way who is under the age of 13 shall not be
seated in the front passenger seat of a motor vehicle on any way unless: (i) the motor vehicle
does not have a rear passenger seat; or (ii) the rear passenger seat of the motor vehicle is
occupied by other passengers under the age of 13.".
of 1